Utah statutes.
41-6a-1304.   School buses -- Rules regarding design and operation.
(1) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the Department of Transportation by and with the advice of the
State Board of Education and the Department of Public Safety shall adopt and
enforce rules, not inconsistent with this chapter, to govern the design and
operation of all school buses in this state when:
(i)  owned and operated by any school district;
(ii)  privately owned and operated under contract with a school district; or
(iii)  privately owned for use by a private school.
(b)  The rules under this Subsection (1) shall by reference be made a part of
any contract with a school district or private school to operate a school bus.
(2)  Every school district or private school, its officers and employees, and
every person employed under contract by a school district or private school
shall be subject to the rules under Subsection (1).
